North Carolina, session 2025, SB367.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the Education Lottery Fund, established
in G.S. 18C-164(a), to the Office of State Budget and Management the sum of eight million
dollars ($8,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to the
following private Historically Black Colleges and Universities (HBCUs) in accordance with
subsection (b) of this section:
(1) Bennett College.
(2) Johnson C. Smith University.
(3) Livingstone College.
(4) Shaw University.
SECTION 1.(b) The Office of State Budget and Management shall allocate the
funding appropriated in subsection (a) of this section to each of the listed HBCUs in an amount
proportional to the number of undergraduate students enrolled at each eligible constituent
institution who are residents of North Carolina and recipients of a federal Pell Grant.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S367-v-1*